Utah statutes.
48-2c-118.   Waiver of notice.

If, under the provisions of this chapter, the articles of organization, or the operating agreement of a company, notice is required to be given to a member or manager of a company, a waiver in writing signed by the person entitled to the notice, whether made before or after the time for notice to be given, is equivalent to the giving of notice.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

